Tennessee, session 114, SB2372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-107, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) It is an offense for a person to adulterate any food product or liquid that is
manufactured, marketed, grown, or produced for human consumption or any
pharmaceutical product that is designed, marketed, or prescribed for the diagnosis or
treatment of a disease or medical condition by placing in, mixing with, or adding to the
product or liquid, any object, liquid, powder, or other substance with the intent to cause
the following to a user of the product or liquid:
(1) Involuntary intoxication;
(2) Bodily injury;
(3) Serious bodily injury; or
(4) Death.
(b)
(1) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause
involuntary intoxication is a Class D felony.
(2) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause bodily
injury is a Class C felony.
(3) A violation of this section where the person intends to cause serious
bodily injury or death is a Class B felony.
SB2372
012658
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 57, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Drink drug testing device" means a device that:
(A) Utilizes disposable test strips to detect the presence of drugs
in intoxicating drinks;
(B) Is capable of detecting the presence of controlled substances,
drugs, and drug analogs, salts, and isomers in a beverage that are used
to incapacitate or intoxicate a person for purposes of assaulting the
person or committing a crime;
(C) Detects, at a minimum, not less than ten (10) controlled
substances, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802.6, and not less than two (2)
date rape drugs, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 841(g)(2)(A);
(D) Provides results in less than five (5) minutes after testing a
beverage; and
(E) Is manufactured in the United States or its territories;
(2) "Intoxicating beverage" means alcoholic beverages, spirits, wine,
beer, and any other beverage containing alcohol; and
(3) "Licensee" means a person, retailer, distiller, vintner, manufacturer,
winery, grocery store, or other entity licensed or permitted under this title to sell
or offer samples of intoxicating beverages, whether in bottles or packages or by
the drink, on or from a licensed premises.
(b) A licensee authorized to sell or offer samples of intoxicating beverages for
consumption on any licensed premises shall not serve intoxicating beverages on the
licensed premises unless the licensee maintains a drink drug testing device approved by
- 2 - 012658

the commission that is readily available upon the request of a customer that is capable
of rapidly testing a beverage suspected of being spiked, laced, or contaminated with a
controlled substance or other drug.
(c) A licensee shall post a notice in a prominent and conspicuous location on the
licensed premises that informs customers of the availability of drink drug testing devices.
(d) A licensee is not liable for a defective test or inaccurate test result, including,
but not limited to, a false positive or false negative test result.
(e) A licensee shall provide a drink drug testing device to a customer for free or
at a cost not to exceed the reasonable cost of the device to the licensee.
(f) A licensee shall ensure that drink drug testing devices offered to customers
have not exceeded their expiration date or recommended period of use, according to the
product label, product packaging, or manufacturer's recommendation.
(g) The commission, in collaboration with the Tennessee bureau of investigation,
shall ensure that drink drug testing devices accurately test for the number of substances
required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) and may require that such devices test for additional
substances, as may be in the best interest of the public.
SECTION 3. Section 1 takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it. For all
other purposes, this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012658